Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 4 Transfer of Vehicles

31-4-1.
Expiration of registration by transfer of interest in vehicle — Disposition of plates.

Whenever the owner of a registered vehicle transfers or assigns his or her title or interest in ownership, or whenever he or she shall request the transfer of the registration to another vehicle owned by him or her, or shall remove the vehicle from the highways of this state to be used solely upon his or her property, the registration of the vehicle shall expire. The owner shall remove the registration plates from the vehicle and forward them to the division of motor vehicles, or may have such plates and the registration number thereon assigned to another vehicle upon payment of the fees required by law and subject to the rules and regulations of the division of motor vehicles. Any corporation or limited liability company in the business of providing vehicle leasing or vehicle rental may cancel a registration by submitting a sworn, notarized affidavit to the division of motor vehicles stating that the registration plates are unavailable due to loss, theft, or other reasons.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 4, § 1; P.L. 1952, ch. 2937, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-4-1

; P.L. 1999, ch. 495, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 362, § 1.

31-4-2.
Endorsement and forwarding of registration card.

The owner shall also endorse the name and address of the transferee and the date of transfer upon the reverse side of the registration card issued for the vehicle and shall immediately forward the card to the division of motor vehicles. However, the number plates need not be returned if the owner shall, within ten (10) days of such transfer or assignment, secure the registration of another vehicle.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 4, § 1; P.L. 1951, ch. 2826, § 8; P.L. 1952, ch. 2937, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-4-2

.

31-4-3.
Temporary registration — Invoice voucher issued by dealer.

Any person who purchases a motor vehicle from a bona fide licensed dealer and who presently has a motor vehicle registered in this state, may operate the newly acquired motor vehicle for a period of thirty (30) days following the date of the original dated voucher. During this period any operator of the newly acquired vehicle shall carry the original dated bill of sale or invoice voucher which shall be accompanied by a numbered state sales tax form. The voucher or bill of sale shall recite the registration number to be transferred from the former vehicle to the newly acquired vehicle.

The bill of sale or invoice voucher shall be sequentially and numerically identified, dated on the day of sale, and shall be valid for not more than thirty (30) days following the date of the original dated voucher. No dealer or any other person shall extend or alter the date nor shall a new bill of sale be issued to the purchaser as a means to circumvent this section.

Every dealer shall keep a sequential record of each temporary certificate issued and those records shall be available during business hours for examination by any police officer or inspector of the division of motor vehicles as designated by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 4, § 1; P.L. 1951, ch. 2698, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-4-3

; P.L. 1962, ch. 198, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 91, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 205, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 104; P.L. 2022, ch. 249, § 1, effective June 28, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 250, § 1, effective June 28, 2022.

31-4-4.
Registration by transferee.

The transferee before operating or permitting the operation of an acquired vehicle upon a highway shall apply for and obtain the registration for it, as upon an original registration, except as otherwise permitted in §§

31-4-5

—

31-4-7

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 4, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-4-4

.

31-4-5.
Dealers exempt from new registration.

When the transferee of a vehicle is a dealer who holds the vehicle for resale and lawfully operates the vehicle under dealers’ number plates or when the transferee does not drive the vehicle or permit it to be driven upon the highways, the transferee shall not be required to obtain a new registration of the vehicle.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 4, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-4-5

.

31-4-6.
Transfer of interest by operation of law.

Whenever the title or interest of an owner in or to a registered vehicle shall pass to another otherwise than by voluntary transfer, the registration for the vehicle shall expire and the vehicle shall not be operated upon any highway unless and until the person entitled to possession of the vehicle shall apply for and obtain the registration for it. However, when the title or interest of the owner passes to another by reason of death, insolvency, or bankruptcy, the vehicle may continue to be operated under the registration previously issued for it until the possession of the vehicle has been transferred by the legal representative, assignee, receiver, or trustee in bankruptcy, or until the registration shall expire, whichever shall first occur.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 4, § 4; P.L. 1951, ch. 2826, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

31-4-6

.

31-4-6.1.
Transfer of interest between spouses.

Whenever a person transfers his or her interest or title in or to a registered vehicle to his or her spouse, the administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall not transfer the registration unless the application is accompanied by a separate signed and notarized statement from the transferor indicating his or her approval of the transfer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 90, § 1.

31-4-7.
Repossession of vehicle.

In the event of repossession of a motor vehicle under a rental agreement, lease, contract of conditional sale, or other title retention agreement, or in the event title becomes vested in the holder of a lien, mortgage, or encumbrance upon a motor vehicle, the person repossessing or so obtaining title may apply to the division of motor vehicles for and obtain bailee registration plates, and may operate the vehicle under those special plates only for purposes of transporting the same to a garage or warehouse, or for purposes of demonstrating or selling the same. Whoever shall so obtain possession of a vehicle shall return the registration plates found on the vehicle and the registration card, if available, to the division of motor vehicles within five (5) days thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 4, § 4; P.L. 1951, ch. 2826, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

31-4-7

.

31-4-8.
Dismantled vehicles.

Any owner dismantling or wrecking any registered vehicle shall immediately forward to the division of motor vehicles, the registration card, and the registration plate or plates last issued for that vehicle.

Any motor vehicle, if repaired must be inspected and approved by the motor vehicles enforcement division prior to registration and, if required, reissuance of a new Rhode Island vehicle identification plate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 4, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

31-4-8

; P.L. 1974, ch. 207, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 229, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 221, § 4.

31-4-8.1.
Penalties.

Any individual, company, corporation, owner, or any insurance firm or representative thereof who violates any of the provisions of §

31-4-8

shall be guilty of a felony and shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, or a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 229, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 324, § 11.

31-4-9.
Out-of-state purchases.

Any person who purchases a motor vehicle outside the state of Rhode Island from a bona fide licensed dealer and who presently has a motor vehicle registered in this state may, when the new vehicle purchased has the same number of wheels as the presently owned and registered vehicle, operate the newly acquired motor vehicle for a period of thirty (30) days following the date of transfer provided that the number plates issued upon registration of the transferred motor vehicle are attached to the newly acquired vehicle. During this period any operator of the newly acquired vehicle shall carry an original dated copy of the bill of sale reciting the registration number to be transferred from the former vehicle to the newly acquired vehicle.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 7, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 249, § 1, effective June 28, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 250, § 1, effective June 28, 2022.

31-4-10.
Temporary transfer of registration.

A person who transfers the ownership of a registered motor vehicle or trailer owned by him or her to another or who loses possession of it and who intends to transfer the registration of the motor vehicle or trailer to a newly acquired vehicle may, subject to other provisions of this title, operate the newly acquired motor vehicle or trailer for a period of thirty (30) days following the date of transfer within the period of which the transferred vehicle was registered, provided that the number plates issued upon registration of the transferred motor vehicle are attached to the newly acquired vehicle.

During these periods, any operator of a newly acquired vehicle shall carry an original copy of the bill of sale reciting the registration number to be transferred from the former vehicle to the newly acquired vehicle, the date of the sale or transfer, the make and identification number of the vehicle, and the signature and address of the seller.

This section shall apply only to transfer of registration between vehicles with the same number of wheels.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 399, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 249, § 1, effective June 28, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 250, § 1, effective June 28, 2022.

31-4-11.
Sale of automobiles — Required equipment.

No automobile shall be sold, whether new or used, by a dealer, at wholesale or retail, unless the automobile is equipped with a spare tire and a jack, both of which must be functional and operational. The provisions of this section shall not apply:

To an automobile equipped with tires that without any tire air inflation permit vehicle operation for at least fifty (50) miles at speeds up to at least fifty-five (55) miles per hour; or

An automobile equipped with a factory installed tire repair and inflation system.

A violation of this section shall constitute a misdemeanor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 257, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 286, § 1.